Illinois, session 104th, HB1223.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Racial Impact Note Act is amended by adding 5Section 110-30 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 83/110-30 new)7    Sec. 110-30. Governor's recommendations regarding the 8production of statements or notes.9    (a) By December 31, 2025, the Office of the Governor shall 10submit a report to the General Assembly with recommendations 11regarding the production of statements or notes that a member 12of the General Assembly may request under this Act. The report 13shall include recommendations:14        (1) on the methodology for estimating the impact of 15    proposed legislation on racial and ethnic minorities as 16    specified under Section 110-5; 17        (2) for estimating the racial and ethnic composition 18    of the population who may be impacted by proposed 19    legislation as specified under Section 110-5; 20        (3) on formatting for the production of any statement 21    or note requested under this Act; 22        (4) on the methodology for evaluating equitable 23    outcomes for underserved populations in Illinois pursuant   HB1223- 2 -LRB104 05990 SPS 16023 b1    to paragraph (10) of subsection (d) of Section 20-15 of 2    the Data Governance and Organization to Support Equity and 3    Racial Justice Act; and 4        (5) on a course of training to occur on a regular basis 5    for personnel of State agencies that may be required to 6    prepare a statement or note requested under this Act. 7    (b) Subject to appropriation, the Office of the Governor 8may contract with an entity or entities that have expertise in 9racial impact or equity impact assessments for the production 10of the report required by this Section. 11    (c) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027.  12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.